Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Board of Conservation and Recreation.

§ 10.1-105.
Board of Conservation and Recreation.

The Board of Conservation and Recreation shall be reorganized and is established as a policy board in the executive branch in accordance with § 2.2-2100 and shall consist of 12 members to be appointed by the Governor. The Board shall be the successor to the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches and the Virginia State Parks Foundation. The members of the Board shall initially be appointed for terms of office as follows: three for a one-year term, three for a two-year term, three for a three-year term, and three for a four-year term. The Governor shall designate the term to be served by each appointee at the time of appointment. Appointments thereafter shall be made for four-year terms. No person shall serve more than two consecutive full terms. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. All terms shall begin July 1. Board members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. In making appointments, the Governor shall endeavor to select persons suitably qualified to consider and act upon the various special interests and problems related to the programs of the Department. The Board may appoint subcommittees of not less than three to consider and deal with special interests and problems related to programs of the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-3; 1954, c. 487; 1958, c. 427; 1966, cc. 477, 510; 1984, c. 750; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656; 1991, c. 84; 2003, cc. 79, 89.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 84, cl. 3 provides: “That existing regulations promulgated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation under the stormwater management program (§

10.1-603.1

et seq.) are transferred to the Board of Conservation and Recreation and shall remain in full force and effect until any such regulation is amended, modified, or repealed by the Board of Conservation and Recreation.”

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 3 provides: “That all rules and regulations adopted by the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until amended or rescinded by the Board of Conservation and Recreation. The Board of Conservation and Recreation shall promulgate as soon as practicable any necessary changes to the regulations to complete the consolidation of the Boards.”

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 4 provides: “That of the members currently serving on the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia State Parks Foundation, and the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches, a minimum of two members of each shall be appointed by the Governor to new first-term appointments to the reconstituted Board of Conservation and Recreation.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and substituted “be reorganized and is established as a policy board in the executive branch in accordance with § 2.2-2100 and shall consist of 12 members to be appointed by the Governor” for “hereafter in this chapter be referred to as the Board” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “be the successor to the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches and the Virginia State Parks Foundation” for “consist of nine members appointed by the Governor” at the end of the second sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “Board” for “board,” and substituted “three for a two-year term, three for a three-year term, and three for a four-year term” for “two for a two-year term, two for a three-year term, and two for a four-year term” at the end, and inserted the fourth sentence.

§ 10.1-106.
Officers; meetings; quorum.

The Board shall elect one of its members chairman, and another as vice-chairman. The Director or his designee shall serve as executive secretary to the Board.

The Board shall meet at least three times a year on the call of the chairman or the Director. The vice-chairman shall fill the position of chairman in the event the chairman is not available. A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 10-4, 10-5; 1958, c. 427; 1968, c. 126; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 84; 2003, cc. 79, 89.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 3, provide: “That all rules and regulations adopted by the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until amended or rescinded by the Board of Conservation and Recreation. The Board of Conservation and Recreation shall promulgate as soon as practicable any necessary changes to the regulations to complete the consolidation of the Boards.”

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 4, provide: “That of the members currently serving on the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia State Parks Foundation, and the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches, a minimum of two members of each shall be appointed by the Governor to new first-term appointments to the reconstituted Board of Conservation and Recreation.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and in the first paragraph, rewrote the second sentence, which formerly read: “A representative of the Department shall serve as secretary to the Board,” and in the second paragraph, substituted “three” for “four” in the first sentence.

§ 10.1-107.
General powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall advise the Governor and the Director on activities of the Department. Upon the request of the Governor, or the Director, the Board shall institute investigations and make recommendations.The Board shall formulate recommendations to the Director concerning:

Requests for grants or loans pertaining to outdoor recreation.

Designation of recreational sites eligible for recreational access road funds.

Designations proposed for scenic rivers, scenic highways, and Virginia byways.

Acquisition of real property by fee simple or other interests in property for the Department including, but not limited to, state parks, state recreational areas, state trails, greenways, natural areas and natural area preserves, and other lands of biological, environmental, historical, recreational or scientific interest.

Acquisition of bequests, devises and gifts of real and personal property, and the interest and income derived therefrom.

Stage one and stage two plans, master plans, and substantial acquisition or improvement amendments to master plans as provided in §

10.1-200.1

.

The Board shall have the authority to promulgate regulations necessary for the execution of the Public Beach Conservation and Development Act, Article 2 (§

10.1-705

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of this title.

The Board shall assist the Department in the duties and responsibilities described in Subtitle I (§

10.1-100

et seq.) of Title 10.1.

The Board is authorized to conduct fund-raising activities as deemed appropriate and will deposit such revenue into the State Parks Projects Fund pursuant to subsection C of §

10.1-202

.

The Board shall advise the Governor and the Director concerning the protection or management of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System as defined in §

10.1-400

. Upon the request of the Governor, or the Director, the Board shall institute investigations and make recommendations. The Board shall have general powers and duties to (i) advise the Director on the appointment of Scenic River Advisory Committees or other local or regional committees pursuant to §

10.1-401

; (ii) formulate recommendations concerning designations for proposed scenic rivers or extensions of existing scenic rivers; (iii) consider and comment to the Director on any federal, state, or local governmental plans to approve, license, fund, or construct facilities that would alter any of the assets that qualified the river for scenic designation; (iv) assist the Director in reviewing and making recommendations regarding all planning for the use and development of water and related land resources including the construction of impoundments, diversions, roadways, crossings, channels, locks, canals, or other uses that change the character of a stream or waterway or destroy its scenic assets, so that full consideration and evaluation of the river as a scenic resource will be given before alternative plans for use and development are approved; (v) assist the Director in preserving and protecting the natural beauty of the scenic rivers, assuring the use and enjoyment of scenic rivers for fish and wildlife, scenic, recreational, geologic, historic, cultural, or other assets, and encouraging the continuance of existing agricultural, horticultural, forestal and open space land and water uses; (vi) advise the Director and the affected local jurisdiction on the impacts of proposed uses of each scenic river and its related land resources; and (vii) assist local governments in solving problems associated with the Virginia Scenic Rivers System, in consultation with the Director.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-12; 1958, c. 427; 1962, c. 355; 1984, c. 750; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 84; 1998, c. 780; 2003, cc. 79, 89; 2005, cc. 25, 102; 2009, c. 856; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 3, provide: “That all rules and regulations adopted by the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until amended or rescinded by the Board of Conservation and Recreation. The Board of Conservation and Recreation shall promulgate as soon as practicable any necessary changes to the regulations to complete the consolidation of the Boards.”

Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89, cl. 4, provide: “That of the members currently serving on the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia State Parks Foundation, and the Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches, a minimum of two members of each shall be appointed by the Governor to new first-term appointments to the reconstituted Board of Conservation and Recreation.”

Acts 2005, c. 102, cl. 2 provides: “That the Governor shall make new appointments for each of the three at-large members of the Board in accordance with the provisions of this act on July 1, 2005. The new appointments of the at-large members of the Board shall go into effect upon the expiration of the current members’ terms in January 2006, and the terms shall be staggered as follows: one member for a term of two years; one member for a term of three years; and one member for a term of four years. The Governor shall designate the term to be served by each appointee at the time of appointment and may reappoint the existing at-large members of the Board.”

The 1998 amendment

added subdivision A 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and inserted “and for the execution of the Public Beach Conservation and Development Act, Article 2 (§

10.1-705

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of this title” at the end of subsection B; and added subsections C and D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 25 deleted “and historical” following “recreational” in subdivision A 2.

The 2005 amendment by c. 102 deleted “Virginia Stormwater Management Act, Article 1.1 §

10.1-603.1

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of this title and for the execution of the” preceding “Public Beach” in B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 856 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” near the end in subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 93, are identical, and added subsection E.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Department of Conservation and Recreation may regulate swimming

in public parks, natural preserves, and other areas over which the Department exercises supervisory authority, but lacks the authority to regulate swimming in other waters. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Albert C. Pollard, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 10-074, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 50 (8/23/10).